Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1644
Department; employ personnel.

The department shall employ an engineer and such individuals otherwise qualified by training and experience in the design, inspection, construction, reconstruction, enlargement, repair, alteration, maintenance, operation, breach, removal, or abandonment of dams as necessary to carry out the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 44.